North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 3. Warrants.

§§ 15-18 through 15-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to warrants, see

G.S. 15A-301

through 15A-305.

§ 15-24.1.
Amendment of warrant to show ownership of property.

Any criminal warrant may be amended in the superior court, before or during the trial, when there shall appear to be any variance between the allegations in the warrant and the evidence in setting forth the ownership of property if, in the opinion of the court, such amendment will not prejudice the defendant. This section shall be construed as enlarging and not limiting the conditions and situations under which a warrant may be amended.

History.

1965, c. 285.